California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 213.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.17.

(a) Medicare supplement policies and certificates shall include a renewal, continuation, or conversion provision. The language or specifications of the provision shall be consistent with the type of contract issued. The provision shall be appropriately captioned and shall appear on the first page of the policy, and shall include any reservation by the issuer of the right to change premiums and any automatic renewal premium increases based on the policyholder’s age.

(b) Except for riders or endorsements by which the issuer effectuates a request made in writing by the insured, exercises a specifically reserved right under a Medicare supplement policy, or is required to reduce or eliminate benefits to avoid duplication of
 Medicare benefits, all riders or endorsements added to a Medicare supplement policy after the date of issue or upon reinstatement or renewal that reduce or eliminate benefits or coverage in the policy shall require a signed acceptance by the insured. After the date of policy or certificate issue, any rider or endorsement that increases benefits or coverage with a concomitant increase in premium during the policy term shall be agreed to in writing signed by the insured, unless the benefits are required by the minimum standards for Medicare supplement policies, or if the increased benefits or coverage is required by law. If a separate additional premium is charged for benefits provided in connection with riders or endorsements, the premium charge shall be set forth in the policy.

(c) Medicare supplement policies or certificates shall not provide for the payment of benefits based on standards described as “usual and customary,” “reasonable and
 customary,” or words of similar import.

(d) If a Medicare supplement policy or certificate contains any limitations with respect to preexisting conditions, those limitations shall appear as a separate paragraph of the policy and be labeled as “Preexisting Condition Limitations.”

(e) (1) Medicare supplement policies and certificates shall have a notice prominently printed on the first page of the policy or certificate, and of the outline of coverage, or attached thereto, in no less than 10-point uppercase type, stating in substance that the policyholder or certificate holder shall have the right to return the policy or certificate, via regular mail, within 30 days of receiving it, and to have the full premium refunded if, after examination of the policy or certificate, the insured person is not satisfied for any reason. The return shall void the contract from
 the beginning, and the parties shall be in the same position as if no contract had been issued.

(2) For purposes of this section, a timely manner shall be no later than 30 days after the issuer receives the returned contract.

(3) If the issuer fails to refund all prepaid or periodic charges paid in a timely manner, then the applicant shall receive interest on the paid charges at the legal rate of interest on judgments as provided in Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The interest shall be paid from the date the issuer received the returned contract.

(f) (1) Issuers of health insurance policies, certificates, or contracts that provide hospital or medical expense coverage on an expense incurred or indemnity basis, other than incidentally, to persons eligible for Medicare shall provide
 to those applicants a Guide to Health Insurance for People with Medicare in the form developed jointly by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and in a type size no smaller than 12-point type. Delivery of the guide shall be made whether or not the policies or certificates are advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery as Medicare supplement policies or certificates as defined in this article. Except in the case of direct response issuers, delivery of the guide shall be made to the applicant at the time of application, and acknowledgment of receipt of the guide shall be obtained by the issuer. Direct response issuers shall deliver the guide to the applicant upon request, but not later than at the time the policy is delivered.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “form” means the language, format, type size, type proportional spacing, bold character, and line spacing.

(g) As soon as practicable, but no later than 30 days prior to the annual effective date of any Medicare benefit changes, an issuer shall notify its policyholders and certificate holders of modifications it has made to Medicare supplement policies or certificates in a format acceptable to the commissioner. The notice shall include both of the following:

(1) A description of revisions to the Medicare Program and a description of each modification made to the coverage provided under the Medicare supplement policy or certificate.

(2) Inform each policyholder or certificate holder as to when any premium adjustment is to be made due to changes in Medicare.

(h) The notice of benefit modifications and any premium adjustments shall be in outline form and in clear
 and simple terms so as to facilitate comprehension.

(i) The notices shall not contain or be accompanied by any solicitation.

(j) (1) Issuers shall provide an outline of coverage to all applicants at the time application is presented to the prospective applicant and, except for direct response policies, shall obtain an acknowledgment of receipt of the outline from the applicant. If an outline of coverage is provided at the time of application and the Medicare supplement policy or certificate is issued on a basis which would require revision of the outline, a substitute outline of coverage properly describing the policy or certificate shall accompany the policy or certificate when it is delivered and contain the following statement, in no less than 12-point type, immediately above the company name:
“NOTICE: Read this outline of coverage carefully. It is not identical to the outline of coverage provided upon application and the coverage originally applied for has not been issued.”
(2) The outline of coverage provided to applicants pursuant to this section consists of four parts: a cover page, premium information, disclosure pages, and charts displaying the features of each benefit plan offered by the issuer. The outline of coverage shall be in the language and format prescribed below in no less than 12-point type. All Medicare supplement plans authorized by federal law shall be shown on the cover page, and the plans that are offered by the issuer shall be prominently identified. Premium information for plans that are offered shall be shown on the cover page or immediately following the cover page and shall be prominently displayed. The premium and mode shall
 be stated for all plans that are offered to the prospective applicant. All possible premiums for the prospective applicant shall be illustrated.

(3) The commissioner may adopt regulations to implement this article, including, but not limited to, regulations that specify the required information to be contained in the outline of coverage provided to applicants pursuant to this section, including the format of tables, charts, and other information.

(k) (1) Any disability insurance policy or certificate, a basic, catastrophic or major medical expense policy, or single premium nonrenewal policy or certificate issued to persons eligible for Medicare, other than a Medicare supplement policy, a policy issued pursuant to a contract under Section 1876 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.), a disability income policy, or any other policy
 identified in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.3, advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery in this state to persons eligible for Medicare, shall notify insureds under the policy that the policy is not a Medicare supplement policy or certificate. The notice shall either be printed or attached to the first page of the outline of coverage delivered to insureds under the policy, or if no outline of coverage is delivered, to the first page of the policy or certificate delivered to insureds. The notice shall be in no less than 12-point type and shall contain the following language:
“THIS [POLICY OR CERTIFICATE] IS NOT A MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT [POLICY OR CONTRACT]. If you are eligible for Medicare, review the Guide to Health Insurance for People with Medicare available from the company.”
(2) Applications provided to persons
 eligible for Medicare for the disability insurance policies or certificates described in paragraph (1) shall disclose the extent to which the policy duplicates Medicare in a manner required by the commissioner. The disclosure statement shall be provided as a part of, or together with, the application for the policy or certificate.

(l) (1) Insurers issuing Medicare supplement policies or certificates for delivery in California shall provide an outline of coverage to all applicants at the time of presentation for examination or sale as provided in Section 10605, and in no case later than at the time the application is made. Except for direct response policies, insurers shall obtain a written acknowledgment of receipt of the outline from the applicant.

Any advertisement that is not a presentation for examination or sale as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 10601 shall contain a
 notice in no less than 10-point uppercase type that an outline of coverage is available upon request. The insurer or agent that receives any request for an outline of coverage shall provide an outline of coverage to the person making the request within 14 days of receipt of the request.

(2) If an outline of coverage is provided at or before the time of application and the Medicare supplement policy or certificate is issued on a basis that would require revision of the outline, a substitute outline of coverage properly describing the policy or certificate shall accompany the policy or certificate when it is delivered and contain the following statement, in no less than 12-point type, immediately above the name:
“NOTICE: Read this outline of coverage carefully. It is not identical to the outline of coverage provided upon application and the coverage originally
 applied for has not been issued.”
(3) The outline of coverage shall be in the language and format prescribed in this subdivision in no less than 12-point type, and shall include the following items in the order prescribed below. Titles, as set forth below in paragraphs (B) to (H), inclusive, shall be capitalized, centered, and printed in boldface type.

(A) (i) The following shall only apply to policies sold for effective dates prior to June 1, 2010:

(I) The outline of coverage shall include the items, and in the same order, specified in the chart set forth in Section 17 of the Model Regulation to implement the NAIC Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Model Act, as adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners in 2004.

(II) The cover page shall contain the 14-plan (A-L) charts. The plans offered by the insurer shall be clearly identified. Innovative benefits shall be explained in a manner approved by the commissioner. The text shall read:
“Medicare supplement insurance can be sold in only 12 standard plans. This chart shows the benefits included in each plan. Every insurance company must offer Plan A. Some plans may not be available.

The BASIC BENEFITS included in ALL plans are:

Hospitalization: Medicare Part A coinsurance plus coverage for 365 additional days after Medicare benefits end.

Medical expenses: Medicare Part B coinsurance (usually 20 percent of the Medicare-approved amount).

Blood: First three
 pints of blood each year.

Mammogram: One annual screening to the extent not covered by Medicare.

Cervical cancer test: One annual screening.”
[Reference to the mammogram and cervical cancer screening test shall not be included so long as California is required to disallow them for Medicare beneficiaries by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other agent of the federal government under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395ss.]

(ii) The following shall only apply to policies sold for effective dates on or after June 1, 2010:

(I) The outline of coverage shall include the items, and in the same order specified in the chart set forth in Section 17 of the Model Regulation to implement the NAIC Medicare Supplement Insurance
 Minimum Standards Model Act, as adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners in 2008.

(II) The cover page shall contain all Medicare supplement benefit plan charts A to D, inclusive, F, high deductible F, G, and K to N, inclusive. The plans offered by the insurer shall be clearly identified. Innovative benefits shall be explained in a manner approved by the commissioner. The text shall read:
“Medicare supplement insurance can be sold in only standard plans. This chart shows the benefits included in each plan. Every insurance company must offer Plan A. Some plans may not be available. Plans E, H, I and J are no longer available for sale. [This sentence shall not appear after June 1, 2011.]

The BASIC BENEFITS included in ALL plans are:

Hospitalization: Medicare
 Part A coinsurance plus coverage for 365 additional days after Medicare benefits end.

Medical expenses: Medicare Part B coinsurance (usually 20 percent of the Medicare-approved amount) or copayments for hospital outpatient services. Plans K, L, and N require insureds to pay a portion of Part B coinsurance copayments.

Blood: First three pints of blood each year.

Hospice: Part A coinsurance.

Mammogram: One annual screening to the extent not covered by Medicare.

Cervical cancer test: One annual screening.”
[Reference to the mammogram and cervical cancer screening test shall not be included so long as California is required to disallow them for Medicare beneficiaries by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
 or other agent of the federal government under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395ss.]
(iii) The following shall apply only to policies sold for effective dates on or after January 1, 2020:

(I) The outline of coverage shall include the items, and in the same order specified in the chart set forth in Section 17 of the Model Regulation to implement the NAIC Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Model Act, as adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners in 2016.

(II) The cover page shall contain all Medicare supplement benefit plan charts A to D, inclusive, F, high deductible F, G, high deductible G, and K to N, inclusive. The plans offered by the insurer shall be clearly identified. Plans C, F, and high deductible F shall be noted as available only to applicants
 eligible before 2020. Innovative benefits shall be explained in a manner approved by the commissioner. The text shall read:
“Medicare supplement insurance can be sold in only standard plans. This chart shows the benefits included in each plan. Every insurance company must offer Plan A.

The BASIC BENEFITS included in ALL plans are:

Hospitalization: Medicare Part A coinsurance plus coverage for 365 additional days after Medicare benefits end.

Medical expenses: Medicare Part B coinsurance (usually 20 percent of the Medicare-approved amount) or copayments for hospital outpatient services. Plans K, L, and N require insureds to pay a portion of Part B coinsurance copayments.

Blood: First three pints of blood each year.

Hospice: Part A coinsurance.

Mammogram: One annual screening to the extent not covered by Medicare.

Cervical cancer test: One annual screening.”

[Reference to the mammogram and cervical cancer screening test shall not be included so long as California is required to disallow them for Medicare beneficiaries by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other agent of the federal government under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395ss.]
(B) PREMIUM INFORMATION. Premium information for plans that are offered by the insurer shall be shown on, or immediately following, the cover page and shall be clearly and prominently displayed. The premium and mode shall be stated for all offered plans. All possible premiums for the prospective applicant shall be
 illustrated in writing. If the premium is based on the increasing age of the insured, information specifying when and how premiums will change shall be clearly illustrated in writing. The text shall state: “We [the insurer’s name] can only raise your premium if we raise the premium for all policies like yours in California.”

(C) The text shall state: “Use this outline to compare benefits and premiums among policies.”

(D) READ YOUR POLICY VERY CAREFULLY. The text shall state: “This is only an outline describing your policy’s most important features. The policy is your insurance contract. You must read the policy itself to understand all of the rights and duties of both you and your insurance company.”

(E) THIRTY-DAY RIGHT TO RETURN THIS POLICY. The text shall state: “If you find that you are not satisfied with your
 policy, you may return it to [insert the insurer’s address]. If you send the policy back to us within 30 days after you receive it, we will treat the policy as if it has never been issued and return all of your payments.”

(F) POLICY REPLACEMENT. The text shall read: “If you are replacing another health insurance policy, do NOT cancel it until you have actually received your new policy and are sure you want to keep it.”

(G) DISCLOSURES. The text shall read: “This policy may not fully cover all of your medical costs.” “Neither this company nor any of its agents are connected with Medicare.” “This outline of coverage does not give all the details of Medicare coverage. Contact your local social security office or consult ‘The Medicare Handbook’ for more details.” “For additional information concerning policy benefits, contact the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program
 (HICAP) or your agent. Call the HICAP toll-free telephone number, 1-800-434-0222, for a referral to your local HICAP office. HICAP is a service provided free of charge by the State of California.”

For policies effective on dates on or after June 1, 2010, the following language shall be required until June 1, 2011, “This outline shows benefits and premiums of policies sold for effective dates on or after June 1, 2010. Policies sold for effective dates prior to June 1, 2010 have different benefits and premiums. Plans E, H, I, and J are no longer available for sale.”

(H) [For policies that are not guaranteed issue] COMPLETE ANSWERS ARE IMPORTANT. The text shall read: “When you fill out the application for a new policy, be sure to answer truthfully and completely all questions about your medical and health history. The company may have the right to cancel your policy and refuse to pay any claims if you
 leave out or falsify important medical information.

Review the application carefully before you sign it. Be certain that all information has been properly recorded.”

(I) One chart for each benefit plan offered by the insurer showing the services, Medicare payments, payments under the policy and payments expected from the insured, using the same uniform format and language. No more than four plans may be shown on one page. Include an explanation of any innovative benefits in a manner approved by the commissioner.

(m) An issuer shall comply with all notice requirements of the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 (P.L. 108-173).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 157, Sec. 7.   (SB 784)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.18.

(a) Application forms shall include the following questions designed to elicit information as to whether, as of the date of the application, the applicant currently has Medicare supplement, Medicare Advantage, Medi-Cal coverage, or another health insurance policy or certificate in force or whether a Medicare supplement policy or certificate is intended to replace any other disability policy or certificate presently in force. A supplementary application or other form to be signed by the applicant and agent containing those questions and statements may be used.

 (Statements)

 

(1) You do not need more than one Medicare supplement policy.

(2) If you purchase this policy, you may want to evaluate your existing health coverage and decide if you need multiple coverages.

(3) You may be eligible for benefits under Medi-Cal and may not need a Medicare supplement policy.

(4) If after purchasing this policy you become eligible for Medi-Cal, the benefits and premiums under your Medicare supplement policy can be suspended, if requested, during your entitlement to benefits under Medi-Cal for 24 months. You must request this suspension within 90 days of becoming eligible for Medi-Cal. If you are no longer entitled to Medi-Cal, your suspended Medicare supplement policy or if that is no longer available, a substantially equivalent policy, will be reinstituted if requested within 90 days of
 losing Medi-Cal eligibility. If the Medicare supplement policy provided coverage for outpatient prescription drugs and you enrolled in Medicare Part D while your policy was suspended, the reinstituted policy will not have outpatient prescription drug coverage, but will otherwise be substantially equivalent to your coverage before the date of the suspension.

(5) If you are eligible for, and have enrolled in, a Medicare supplement policy by reason of disability and you later become covered by an employer or union-based group health plan, the benefits and premiums under your Medicare supplement policy can be suspended, if requested, while you are covered under the employer or union-based group health plan. If you suspend your Medicare supplement policy under these circumstances and later lose your employer or union-based group health plan, your suspended Medicare supplement policy or if that is no longer available, a substantially equivalent
 policy, will be reinstituted if requested within 90 days of losing your employer or union-based group health plan. If the Medicare supplement policy provided coverage for outpatient prescription drugs and you enrolled in Medicare Part D while your policy was suspended, the reinstituted policy will not have outpatient prescription drug coverage, but will otherwise be substantially equivalent to your coverage before the date of the suspension.

(6) Counseling services are available in this state to provide advice concerning your purchase of Medicare supplement insurance and concerning medical assistance through the Medi-Cal program, including benefits as a qualified Medicare beneficiary (QMB) and a specified low-income Medicare beneficiary (SLMB). If you want to discuss buying Medicare supplement insurance with a trained insurance counselor, call the California Department of Insurance’s toll-free telephone number 1-800-927-HELP, or access the
 department’s Internet Web site, www.insurance.ca.gov, and ask how to contact your local Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program (HICAP) office. HICAP is a service provided free of charge by the State of California.

 (Questions)

 

If you lost or are losing other health insurance coverage and received a notice from your prior insurer saying you were eligible for guaranteed issue of a Medicare supplement insurance policy or that you had certain rights to buy such a policy, you may be guaranteed acceptance in one or more of our Medicare supplement plans. Please include a copy of the notice from your prior insurer with your application. PLEASE ANSWER ALL QUESTIONS.

[Please mark Yes or No below with an “X.”]

To the best of your knowledge,

(1) (a) Did you turn 65 years of age in the last 6 months?

Yes____ No____

(b) Did you enroll in Medicare Part B in the last 6 months?

Yes____ No____

(c) If yes, what is the effective date?___________________

(2) Are you covered for medical assistance through California’s Medi-Cal program?

NOTE TO APPLICANT: If you have a share of cost under the Medi-Cal program, please answer NO to this question.

Yes____ No____

If yes,

(a) Will Medi-Cal pay your premiums for this Medicare supplement policy?

Yes____ No____

(b) Do you receive benefits from Medi-Cal OTHER THAN payments toward your Medicare Part B premium?

Yes____ No____

(3) (a) If you had coverage from any Medicare plan other than original Medicare within the past 63 days (for example, a Medicare Advantage plan or a Medicare HMO or PPO), fill in your start and end dates below. If you are still covered under this plan, leave “END” blank.

START __/__/__ END __/__/__

(b) If you are still covered under the Medicare plan, do you intend to replace your current coverage with this
 new Medicare supplement policy?

Yes____ No____

(c) Was this your first time in this type of Medicare plan?

Yes____ No____

(d) Did you drop a Medicare supplement policy to enroll in the Medicare plan?

Yes____ No____

(4) (a) Do you have another Medicare supplement policy in force?

Yes____ No____

(b) If so, with what company, and what plan do you have? [optional for direct mailers]

Yes____ No____

(c) If so, do you intend to replace your current Medicare
 supplement policy with this policy?

Yes____ No____

(5) Have you had coverage under any other health insurance within the past 63 days (For example, an employer, union, or individual plan)?

Yes____ No____

(a) If so, with what companies and what kind of policy?

________________________________________________

________________________________________________

________________________________________________

________________________________________________

(b) What are your dates of coverage under the other policy?

START
 __/__/__ END __/__/__

(If you are still covered under the other policy, leave “END” blank.)

 

(b) Agents shall list any other health insurance policies they have sold to the applicant as follows:

(1) List policies sold that are still in force.

(2) List policies sold in the past five years that are no longer in force.

(c) In the case of a direct response issuer, a copy of the application or supplemental form, signed by the applicant, and acknowledged by the issuer, shall be returned to the applicant by the issuer upon delivery of the policy.

(d) Upon determining that a sale will
 involve replacement of Medicare supplement coverage, any issuer, other than a direct response issuer, or its agent, shall furnish the applicant, prior to issuance for delivery of the Medicare supplement policy or certificate, a notice regarding replacement of Medicare supplement coverage. One copy of the notice signed by the applicant and the agent, except when the coverage is sold without an agent, shall be provided to the applicant and an additional signed copy shall be retained by the issuer as provided in Section 10508. A direct response issuer shall deliver to the applicant at the time of the issuance of the policy the notice regarding replacement of Medicare supplement coverage.

(e) The notice required by subdivision (d) for an issuer shall be in the form specified by the commissioner, using, to the extent practicable, a model notice prepared by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for this purpose. The replacement notice
 shall be printed in no less than 12-point type in substantially the following form:

 [Insurer’s name and address]

 NOTICE TO APPLICANT REGARDING REPLACEMENT OF MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT COVERAGE OR MEDICARE ADVANTAGE

 

SAVE THIS NOTICE! IT MAY BE IMPORTANT IN THE FUTURE.

If you intend to cancel or terminate existing Medicare supplement or Medicare Advantage insurance and replace it with coverage issued by [company name], please review the new coverage carefully and replace the existing coverage ONLY if the new coverage materially improves your position. DO NOT CANCEL YOUR PRESENT COVERAGE UNTIL YOU HAVE RECEIVED YOUR
 NEW POLICY AND ARE SURE THAT YOU WANT TO KEEP IT.

If you decide to purchase the new coverage, you will have 30 days after you receive the policy to return it to the insurer, for any reason, and receive a refund of your money.

If you want to discuss buying Medicare supplement or Medicare Advantage coverage with a trained insurance counselor, call the California Department of Insurance’s toll-free telephone number 1-800-927-HELP, and ask how to contact your local Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program (HICAP) office. HICAP is a service provided free of charge by the State of California.

STATEMENT TO APPLICANT FROM THE INSURER AND AGENT: I have reviewed your current health insurance coverage. To the best of my knowledge, the replacement of insurance involved in this transaction does not duplicate coverage or, if applicable, Medicare Advantage coverage because you intend to
 terminate your existing Medicare supplement coverage or leave your Medicare Advantage plan. In addition, the replacement coverage contains benefits that are clearly and substantially greater than your current benefits for the following reasons:

__ Additional benefits that are: ______

__ No change in benefits, but lower premiums.

__ Fewer benefits and lower premiums.

__ Plan has outpatient prescription drug coverage and applicant is enrolled in Medicare Part D.

__ Disenrollment from a Medicare Advantage plan. Reasons for disenrollment:

__ Other reasons specified here: ______

1. Note: If the issuer of the Medicare supplement policy being applied for does not impose, or is otherwise prohibited from imposing,
 preexisting condition limitations, please skip to statement 3 below. Health conditions that you may presently have (preexisting conditions) may not be immediately or fully covered under the new policy. This could result in denial or delay of a claim for benefits under the new policy, whereas a similar claim might have been payable under your present policy.

2. State law provides that your replacement Medicare supplement policy may not contain new preexisting conditions, waiting periods, elimination periods, or probationary periods. The insurer will waive any time periods applicable to preexisting conditions, waiting periods, elimination periods, or probationary periods in the new coverage for similar benefits to the extent that time was spent (depleted) under the original policy.

3. If you still wish to terminate your present policy and replace it with new coverage, be certain to truthfully and completely answer any and all
 questions on the application concerning your medical and health history. Failure to include all material medical information on an application requesting that information may provide a basis for the insurer to deny any future claims and to refund your premium as though your policy had never been in force. After the application has been completed and before you sign it, review it carefully to be certain that all information has been properly recorded. [If the policy or certificate is guaranteed issue, this paragraph need not appear.]

DO NOT CANCEL YOUR PRESENT POLICY UNTIL YOU HAVE RECEIVED YOUR NEW POLICY AND ARE SURE THAT YOU WANT TO KEEP IT.(Signature of Agent, Broker, or Other Representative)(Signature of Applicant)(Date)(f) An issuer, broker, agent, or other person shall not cause an insured to replace a Medicare supplement insurance policy
 unnecessarily. In recommending replacement of any Medicare supplement insurance, an agent shall make reasonable efforts to determine the appropriateness to the potential insured.

(g) An issuer shall not require, request, or obtain health information as part of the application process for an applicant who is eligible for guaranteed issuance of, or open enrollment for, any Medicare supplement coverage pursuant to Section 10192.11 or 10192.12, except for purposes of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10192.11 when the applicant is first enrolled in Medicare Part B. The application form shall include a clear and conspicuous statement that the applicant is not required to provide health information during a period where guaranteed issue or open enrollment applies, as specified in Section 10192.11 or 10192.12, except for purposes of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10192.11 when the applicant is first enrolled in
 Medicare Part B, and shall inform the applicant of those periods of guaranteed issuance of Medicare supplement coverage. This subdivision does not prohibit an issuer from requiring proof of eligibility for a guaranteed issuance of Medicare supplement coverage.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 348, Sec. 21) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 207.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.185.

In addition to any other requirements of law, the following shall apply to a Medicare supplement policy:

(a) The issuer shall not require an amount greater than one month’s premium to be submitted with an application for the policy of insurance if interim coverage is not provided. If interim coverage is provided, the issuer shall not require an amount greater than two months’ premium for that purpose. No further premiums may be collected until the policy is delivered to the applicant.

(b) The issuer shall notify the applicant within 60 days from the date the issuer or issuer’s authorized representative or producer receives the application and the amount as to whether or not the applicant will be issued a policy of insurance. If the applicant is not so notified, the issuer or issuer’s authorized representative or producer shall pay interest to the applicant on the funds that the applicant submitted with the application, at the legal rate of interest on judgments as provided in Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure, from the date the issuer or issuer’s authorized representative or producer received those funds until they are refunded to the applicant or are applied toward the premium.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.19.

(a) An issuer shall provide a copy of any Medicare supplement advertisement intended for use in this state whether through written, radio, or television medium to the commissioner for review at least 30 days before dissemination of the advertisement. The advertisement shall comply with all applicable laws of California.

(b) A television, radio, mail, or newspaper advertisement which is designed to produce leads either by use of a coupon or a request to write or otherwise contact
 the issuer, a production agent, or other person or a subsequent advertisement prior to contact shall include information disclosing that an agent may contact the applicant if that is the fact. In addition, an agent who makes contact with a consumer, as a result of acquiring that consumer’s name from a lead generating device shall disclose that fact in the initial contact with the consumer.

(c) No issuer, agent, broker, solicitor, or other person or other entity shall solicit residents of this state for the purchase of a Medicare supplement policy through the use of a true or fictitious name which is deceptive or misleading with regard to the status, character, or proprietary or representative capacity of the entity or person or the true purpose of the advertisement.

(d) For purposes of this section, an advertisement includes envelopes, stationery, business cards, or other
 materials designed to describe and encourage the purchase of a Medicare supplement policy.

(e) Advertisements may not employ words, letters, initials, symbols, or other devices which are so similar to those used by governmental agencies, a nonprofit or charitable institution, senior organization, or other insurer that they could have the capacity or tendency to mislead the public. Examples of misleading materials, include, but are not limited to, those which imply any of the following:

(1) The advertised coverages are somehow provided by or are endorsed by the governmental agencies or the other insurer.

(2) The advertiser is the same as, is connected with, or is endorsed by, the governmental agencies, other entity, or other insurers.

(3) That the
 advertised coverages are somehow provided by or are endorsed by the governmental agencies, other entity, or other insurers.

(f) No advertisement shall use the name of a state or political subdivision thereof in a policy name or description.

(g) No advertisement may use any name, service mark, slogan, symbol, or a device in any manner that implies that the issuer or the Medicare supplement policy advertised, or that any agency who may call upon the consumer in response to the advertisement is connected with a governmental agency, such as the Social Security Administration.

(h) No advertisement shall be used that fails to prominently display the disclaimer to the effect of “Not Connected with or endorsed by the U.S. Government or the federal Medicare program.”

(i) No advertisement may imply that the reader may lose a right or privilege or benefit under federal, state, or local law if he or she fails to respond to the advertisement.

(j) An issuer, agent, broker, or other entity may not use an address so as to mislead or deceive as to the true identity, location, or licensing status of the issuer, agent, broker, or other entity.

(k) No issuer may use, in the trade name of its insurance policy, any terminology or words so similar to the name of a governmental agency or governmental program as to have the tendency to confuse, deceive, or mislead a prospective purchaser.

(l) All advertisements used by agents, producers, brokers, solicitors, or other persons of an issuer must have prior written approval of the issuer before they may be used.

(m) No issuer, agent, broker, or other entity may solicit a particular class by use of advertisements which state or imply that the occupational or other status as members of the class entitles them to reduced rates on a group or other basis when, in fact, the policy being advertised is sold only on an individual basis at regular rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.195.

The commissioner may prescribe by regulation a standard form and the contents of an informational brochure for persons eligible for Medicare by reason of age which is intended to improve the buyer’s ability to select the most appropriate coverage and improve the buyer’s understanding of Medicare. Except in the case of direct response insurance policies, the commissioner may require by regulation that the information brochure be provided to any applicant eligible for Medicare concurrently with delivery of the outline of coverage. With respect to direct response
 insurance policies, the commissioner may require by regulation that the prescribed brochure be provided upon request to any applicant eligible for Medicare by reason of age, but in no event later than the time of policy delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.20.

(a) An issuer, directly or through its producers, shall do each of the following:

(1) Establish marketing procedures to ensure that any comparison of policies by its agents or other producers will be fair and accurate.

(2) Establish marketing procedures to ensure that excessive insurance is not sold or issued.
